Utah statutes.
34A-2-109.   Interstate and intrastate commerce.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), this chapter and Chapter 3, Utah
Occupational Disease Act, apply to employers and their employees engaged in:
(a) intrastate commerce;
(b)  interstate commerce; and
(c)  foreign commerce.
(2)  If a rule of liability or method of compensation is established by the
Congress of the United States as to interstate or foreign commerce, this
chapter and Chapter 3 apply only to the extent that:
(a)  this chapter and Chapter 3 has a mutual connection with intrastate work;
and
(b)  the connection to intrastate work is clearly separable and
distinguishable from interstate or foreign commerce.
